Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 3

Regional Plan

13-3-301. Regional plan — Municipality adopting.

It is the function and duty of a regional planning commission to make and adopt a general regional plan for the physical development of the territory of the region. Any such plan shall include the planning of municipal territory to the extent which, in the commissioner's judgment, the same is related to the planning of the region as a whole; provided, that the plan shall not be deemed an official plan or part of the official plan of any municipality having a municipal planning commission unless adopted as such by the municipal planning commission. The board of aldermen or commissioners or other chief legislative body of any municipality may designate the regional planning commission of a region in which such municipality is located as the planning commission of such municipality, and, in the event of such designation, the regional planning commission shall have such powers regarding the planning of the municipality, and the plan of the municipality made and adopted by the regional planning commission shall have the same force and effect as provided by law for municipal planning commissions and municipal plans.

The regional plan, with the accompanying maps, plats, charts, and descriptive matter, shall show the regional planning commission's recommendations for the development of the territory covered by the plan, and may include, among other things, the general location, character and extent of public ways, ground and other public property; the general location and extent of public utilities and terminals, whether publicly or privately owned, for power, light, heat, sanitation, transportation, communication, water and other purposes; the removal, relocation, extension, widening, narrowing, vacating, abandonment or change of use of existing public ways, grounds, open spaces, buildings, properties, utilities or terminals; the general character, location and extent of community centers, town sites or housing developments; the location and extent of forests, agricultural areas and open development areas for purposes of conservation, food and water supply, sanitary and drainage facilities or the protection of urban development, and the identification of areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined the services are necessary in order for development to occur; a land classification and utilization program; and a zoning plan for the regulation of the height, area, bulk, location and uses of buildings, the distribution of population, and the uses of land for trade, industry, habitation, recreation, agriculture, forestry, soil and water conservation and other purposes.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 11; C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.17 (Williams, § 552.17); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-204; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 1.

Cross-References. Establishment of foreign-trade zones, title 7, ch. 85.

Local regulation of junkyards, § 54-20-122.

Zoning regulations in metropolitan governments, § 7-3-304.

Law Reviews.

Consolidation of County and City Functions and Other Devices for Simplifying Tennessee Local Government (Wallace Mendelson), 8 Vand. L. Rev. 878.

13-3-302. General purpose of plan.

The regional plan shall be made with the general purpose of guiding and accomplishing a coordinated, adjusted, efficient and economic development of the region which will, in accordance with present and future needs and resources, best promote the health, safety, morals, order, convenience, prosperity and welfare of the inhabitants, as well as efficiency and economy in the process of development, including, among other things, such distribution of population and of the uses of the land for urbanization, trade, industry, habitation, recreation, agriculture, forestry and other uses as will tend to create conditions favorable to transportation, health, safety, civic activities and educational and cultural opportunities, reduce the wastes of financial and human resources which result from either excessive congestion or excessive scattering of population, and tend toward an efficient and economic utilization, conservation and production of the supply of food, water, minerals, drainage, sanitary and other facilities and resources, and identify areas where there are inadequate or nonexistent publicly or privately owned and maintained services and facilities when the planning commission has determined that the services are necessary in order for development to occur.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 12; C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.18 (Williams, § 552.18); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-205; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 2.

13-3-303. Procedure of commission in adopting plan.

A regional planning commission may adopt the regional plan as a whole by a single resolution, or, as the work of making the plan progresses, may from time to time adopt a part or parts thereof. The commission may from time to time amend, extend or add to the plan or carry any part of the plan into greater detail. Prior to the adoption of the plan or any part, amendment or addition to the plan, the commission shall hold a public hearing thereon, the time and place of which shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting in which the adoption is to be first considered. The adoption of the plan or any part, amendment or addition shall be by resolution carried by the affirmative votes of not less than a majority of the membership of the commission. The resolution shall refer to the maps and descriptive matter intended by the commission to form the whole or part of the plan, and the action taken shall be recorded on the map or maps and descriptive matter by the identifying signature of the secretary of the commission.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 13; C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.19 (Williams, § 552.19); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-206; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 3.

13-3-304. Certification of plan to counties and municipalities — Adoption by municipalities.

The regional planning commission shall certify a copy of its regional plan or any adopted part or amendment thereof or addition thereto to the department of economic and community development, to the legislative body of the county or of each county lying wholly or partly within the region, and to the planning commission of each municipality having a planning commission and located within the region. Any municipal planning commission which receives any such certification may adopt, as a part or amendment of or addition to the plan of the municipality, so much of the regional plan or part or amendment thereof, or addition thereto as falls within the territory of the municipality, and when so adopted, it shall have the same force and effect as though made and prepared, as well as adopted, by such municipal planning commission.

Once the planning commission of the region or the municipality has adopted and certified the general regional plan, the planning commission's transmittal of the certification to the legislative body may simultaneously include a resolution by the planning commission requesting the legislative body's consideration and adoption of the general regional plan. The county legislative body, by resolution or the municipal legislative body by ordinance, may adopt the general regional plan, or in the case of the municipality, their element of the plan as certified by the planning commission. Prior to the adoption of the general regional plan or amendment of the general regional plan by a legislative body, the legislative body shall hold a public hearing thereon, the time and place of which shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county at least thirty (30) days prior to the meeting in which the adoption or amendment is to be first considered. If the legislative body adopts the general regional plan in the form of an ordinance by the municipality or a resolution by the county, then any land use decisions thereafter made by the legislative body, planning commission or board of zoning appeals when the board of zoning appeals is exercising its powers on matters other than variances, must be consistent with the general regional plan.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B), if the planning commission initiates and votes to adopt an amendment to the general plan, the legislative body must pass the amendment by a majority vote in order for the amendment to be operative.

If the planning commission initiates and votes to adopt an amendment to the general plan, the amendment shall be operative without further action of the legislative body. The planning commission shall transmit its action to the legislative body.

Subdivision (b)(2)(B)(i) shall only apply in any county having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

7,200 7,300

7,975 8,025

12,800 12,900

17,400 17,450

17,700 17,775

20,300 20,400

88,800 88,900

The general regional plan may be amended upon the initiative of the legislative body. The initiative must be transmitted, in writing, to the planning commission for its review, consideration and vote. The planning commission must take action on the amendment within sixty-one (61) days of the submittal of the amendment to the planning commission by the legislative body.

Except as provided in subdivision (b)(3)(C), if the planning commission votes to approve or not approve the amendment or transmits it back to the legislative body with no recommendation, the legislative body must then approve the amendment by a majority vote, in order for the amendment to be operative.

not less than nor more than

7,200 7,300

7,975 8,025

12,800 12,900

17,400 17,450

17,700 17,775

20,300 20,400

88,800 88,900

If the planning commission votes to approve the amendment, the amendment shall be operative without further action of the legislative body. If the planning commission votes not to approve the amendment or to make no recommendation on the amendment, the amendment shall not be operative. The planning commission shall transmit its action back to the legislative body and provide a written explanation for its reasons in not approving the amendment or for not making a recommendation on the initiative transmitted to the commission by the legislative body.

Subdivision (b)(3)(C)(i) shall only apply in any county having a population, according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

The general regional plan may be adopted as an element of the jurisdictions' growth plan through the process established in title 6, chapter 58, but if the regional general plan is not adopted as part of the growth plan, it nevertheless cannot be inconsistent with the growth plan or the intent of title 6, chapter 58.

Acts 1935, ch. 43, § 14; C. Supp. 1950, § 3291.20 (Williams, § 552.20); impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 542, § 15; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-207; Acts 2008, ch. 1150, § 4; 2010, ch. 648, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.